Idaho, session 2026, H0834.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-3521, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-3521. ENCUMBERING APPROPRIATIONS OR EXCESSIVE EXPENDITURES FOR-
BIDDEN -- ENCUMBRANCES TO REVERT -- EXECUTIVE CARRY FORWARD APPROVAL. (1) No
officer, department, bureau, or institution shall encumber any appropria-
tions or be allowed to make any expenditures from appropriations in excess of
the spending authority provided by this chapter.
(2) Encumbrances shall be reported as reductions against appropria-
tions in anticipation of an expenditure, shall be made only for a legally
contracted obligation or for the accrued cost of a specific product or ser-
vice due and payable prior to or as of the end of the current fiscal year or
for the term of the contract obligation, and shall not be used as a means of
reserving a portion of the appropriation of one (1) fiscal year to be used
in combination with the appropriation of the following year. Requests for
executive carry forward shall be accompanied by proper identification of the
accrued cost, which must be adequately covered by appropriated moneys from
the current fiscal year.
(3) Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to the contrary, all
purchase orders issued by the administrator of the division of purchasing,
or purchase orders issued pursuant to a delegation of purchasing authority
to specified state officers and employees, shall be encumbered and, if not
liquidated by payment of the accrued cost during the current fiscal year,
shall be included as executive carry forward. Such encumbrance and execu-
tive carry forward shall not require the approval of the administrator of the
division of financial management for executive carry forward.
(4) When purchase requisitions are submitted by agencies prior to the
administrator of the division of purchasing's fiscal year-end cutoff date,
but not processed either due to workload or bid requirements, agencies may
submit a request for executive carry forward to the administrator of the di-
vision of financial management.
(5) Executive carry forward not liquidated by payment of the accrued
cost during the on or before October 1 of the succeeding fiscal year shall re-
vert to the fund from which it originated and shall be recorded as a reversion
in that fiscal year, unless approved for extension by the administrator of
the division of financial management. Liquidation of executive carry for-
ward shall be recorded as an expenditure only in the fiscal year in which it
is liquidated.


(6) The provisions of this section shall not apply to encumbrances in-
volving vocational educational or career technical reimbursements to edu-
cational institutions or to encumbrances involving contracts for the con-
struction of highways, bridges, buildings, or other primary structures or
capital improvements and, if not liquidated by payment of the accrued cost
during the current fiscal year, shall be included as executive carry for-
ward.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.